New Mexico, session 2026, HB130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five million dollars ($5,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the children, youth and families department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to fund community-based domestic violence programs. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233233.1